Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4145.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [504B.2136] NAMING MINORS AS DEFENDANTS PROHIBITED. new text end new text begin (a) A residential landlord shall not list a minor child of a residential tenant as a defendant in an eviction action complaint against the residential tenant. If a minor is the only person renting the unit from the landlord, the landlord may list the minor as a defendant in an eviction action complaint against the minor. new text end new text begin (b) The requirements of this section may not be waived or modified by the parties to a residential lease. Any provision, whether oral or written, of a lease or other agreement by which any provision of this section is waived by a tenant is contrary to public policy and void. The tenant shall recover from the landlord actual and consequential damages or $300, whichever is greater, for a violation of this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to eviction actions filed on or after that date. new text end